Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1211.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; MARKED TRUNK HIGHWAY 5 AND HENNEPIN COUNTY STATE-AID HIGHWAY 4 INTERCHANGE.new text end new text begin $5,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund for one or more grants to the city of Eden Prairie, Hennepin County, the Department of Transportation, or a combination of these entities for preliminary transportation and utility design, environmental analysis, final transportation and utility design, and right-of-way and utility easement acquisition for an interchange at marked Trunk Highway 5 and Hennepin County State-Aid Highway 4 and approaching roadways to the interchange in the city of Eden Prairie. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2030. new text end